Idaho, session 2025, H0466.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
the appropriation made to the Idaho State Historical Society in Section 1,
Chapter 74, Laws of 2024, is hereby reduced by $821,200 for operating expen-
ditures from the General Fund for the period July 1, 2024, through June 30,
2025.
SECTION 2. In addition to the appropriation made in Section 1, Chap-
ter 94, Laws of 2024, and any other appropriation provided for by law, there
is hereby appropriated to the State Treasurer $821,200 from the America250
Commemoration Fund to be expended for operating expenditures for the period
July 1, 2024, through June 30, 2025.
SECTION 3. There is hereby appropriated and the Office of the State
Controller shall transfer $821,200 from the General Fund to the America250
Commemoration Fund as soon thereafter as practicable for the period July 1,
2024, through June 30, 2025.
SECTION 4. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY. There is hereby reappropriated
to the State Treasurer any unexpended and unencumbered balances appropri-
ated to the State Treasurer from the America250 Commemoration Fund for the
America250 commemoration for fiscal year 2025 for the period July 1, 2025,
through June 30, 2026. The Office of the State Controller shall confirm the
reappropriation amounts, by fund, expense class, and program, with the Leg-
islative Services Office prior to processing the reappropriation authorized
herein.
SECTION 5. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, Sections 1 through 3 of this act shall be in full force and
effect on and after passage and approval, and Section 4 of this act shall be
in full force and effect on and after July 1, 2025.